Hawaii statutes.
[§468L-29] Violation of charter tour
operator provisions. Without limitation to any other remedies or penalties
that may be applicable, any person who knowingly accepts moneys for charter
tours without being registered as a travel agency in compliance with this
chapter, or any charter tour operator that knowingly is not in compliance with
the provisions of this chapter and continues to accept moneys for charter
tours, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. [L 1999, c 258, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next